Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1206
Administrator; duties; powers.

(1) With due regard for the functions of the agencies concerned, and with such guidance and assistance from the board as may be required, the administrator shall:

(a) Establish standards, procedures, and techniques for the effective management of public records;

(b) Make continuing surveys of paperwork operations, and recommend improvements in current records management practices, including but not limited to the economical use of space, equipment, and supplies employed in creating, maintaining, storing, preserving, and servicing records;

(c) Establish standards for the preparation of schedules providing for the retention of records of continuing value, and for the prompt and orderly disposal of records no longer possessing sufficient administrative, legal, historical, or fiscal value to warrant their further retention; and

(d) Obtain from the agencies concerned such reports and other data as are required for the proper administration of the records management program including organizational charts of agencies concerned.

(2) The administrator shall establish standards for designating essential records, shall assist agencies in identifying essential records, and shall guide them in the establishment of programs for the preservation of essential records.

(3) The administrator may advise and assist members of the Legislature and other officials in the maintenance and disposition of their personal or political papers of public interest and may provide such other services as are available to state and local agencies, within the limitation of available funds.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 6, p. 1388;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 4, p. 3171;

Laws 1976, LB 641, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 747, § 2.